Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.120

Effect of judgment against personal representative.

The effect of any judgment rendered against a personal representative shall be only to establish the amount of the judgment as an allowed claim.

[ 1997 c 252 s 18; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.120. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 118; RRS s 1488; prior: Code 1881 s 1478; 1854 p 282 s 90.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.